src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-alashoe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - алашоэ: # Noun 'a goldeneye (kind of bird)'
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom: алашоэ
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Gen: алашоэн
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Acc: алашоэм
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Com: алашоэге
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Dat: алашоэлӓн
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Ine: алашоэштӹ
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Ill: [алашоэш, алашоэшкӹ]
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Lat: алашоэш
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Cmpr: алашоэлӓ
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Abe: алашоэде

     алашоэ+N+Pl+Nom: алашоэвлӓ

     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: алашоэм
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC: алашоэт
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC: алашоэжӹ
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+So/PC: алашоэнӓ
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+So/PC: алашоэдӓ
     алашоэ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/PC: алашоэштӹ
